District of Columbia statutes.
7-1004

Safety standards for drivers of motor vehicles.

The driver of a vehicle in the District of Columbia approaching a blind pedestrian who is carrying a cane predominantly white or metallic in color (with or without a red tip) or a deaf pedestrian, either of whom is using a dog guide shall take all necessary precautions to avoid injury to such blind or deaf pedestrian, and any driver who fails to take such precautions shall be liable in damages for any injury caused such pedestrian. A blind pedestrian in the District of Columbia not carrying such a cane or a deaf pedestrian, either of whom is not using a dog guide in any of the places, accommodations, or conveyances listed in §§ 7-1001 and 7-1002 shall have all of the rights and privileges conferred by law on other persons, and the failure of such a blind pedestrian to carry such a cane or the failure of a blind or deaf pedestrian to use a dog guide in any such places, accommodations, or conveyances shall not be held to constitute nor be evidence of contributory negligence.

History

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 971, Pub. L. 92-515, § 3
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-144, § 2(b), 27 DCR 4659

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1704.
1973 Ed., § 6-1503.